Utah statutes.
51-8-501.   Process to release or modify restrictions on management,
investment, or purpose.
(1) (a)  With the donor's consent in a record, an institution may release or
modify, in whole or in part, a restriction contained in a gift instrument on
the management, investment, or purpose of an institutional fund.
(b)  A release or modification may not allow a fund to be used for a purpose
other than a charitable purpose of the institution.
(2) (a)  If a restriction contained in a gift instrument on the management or
investment of an institutional fund becomes impracticable or wasteful or
impairs the management or investment of the fund, or if because of
circumstances not anticipated by the donor a modification of a restriction
will further the purposes of the fund, the court, upon application of the
institution, may modify the restriction.
(b)  The institution shall notify the attorney general, who must be given an
opportunity to be heard.
(c)  To the extent practicable, any modification must be made in accordance
with the donor's probable intention.
(3) (a)  If a particular charitable purpose or a restriction contained in a
gift instrument on the use of an institutional fund becomes unlawful,
impracticable, impossible to achieve, or wasteful, the court, upon application
of an institution, may modify the purpose of the fund or the restriction on
the use of the fund in a manner consistent with the charitable purposes
expressed in the gift instrument.
(b)  The institution shall notify the attorney general, who must be given an
opportunity to be heard.
(4)  If an institution determines that a restriction contained in a gift
instrument on the management, investment, or purpose of an institutional fund
is unlawful, impracticable, impossible to achieve, or wasteful, the
institution, 60 days after notification to the attorney general, may release
or modify the restriction, in whole or part, if:
(a)  the institutional fund subject to the restriction has a total value of
less than $25,000;
(b)  more than 20 years have elapsed since the fund was established; and
(c)  the institution uses the property in a manner the institution reasonably
determines to be consistent with the charitable purposes expressed in the gift
instrument.
